Florida, session 2026, SB1174.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSubsection (9) of section 1001.212, Florida 23 Statutes, is amended to read: 24 1001.212âOffice of Safe Schools.âThere is created in the 25 Department of Education the Office of Safe Schools. The office 26 is fully accountable to the Commissioner of Education. The 27 office shall serve as a central repository for best practices, 28 training standards, and compliance oversight in all matters 29 regarding school safety and security, including prevention 30 efforts, intervention efforts, and emergency preparedness 31 planning. The office shall: 32 (9)âAward grants to schools to improve the safety and 33 security of schools school buildings based upon recommendations 34 of the security risk assessment developed pursuant to subsection 35 (1) or as provided in s. 1002.42(21). 36 Section 2.âSubsection (21) is added to section 1002.42, 37 Florida Statutes, to read: 38 1002.42âPrivate schools.â 39 (21)âSCHOOL SAFETY EQUIPMENT REQUIREMENTS.â 40 (a)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term: 41 1.ââBallistic shieldâ means a mobile protective device 42 meeting the National Institute of Justiceâs Level IIIA ballistic 43 resistance standards or higher. 44 2.ââBreaching toolâ means a device designed to provide 45 rapid access to locked or barricaded doors in an emergency, 46 including, but not limited to, a Halligan bar, sledgehammer, or 47 hydraulic breaching tool approved by a local law enforcement 48 agency. 49 3.ââCampusâ means the grounds and facilities of a private 50 school. 51 (b)âEach private school shall have at least one breaching 52 tool and one ballistic shield on each campus of the school for 53 use in the event of an active assailant or other life 54 threatening incident. The Department of Education, in 55 consultation with the Department of Law Enforcement, shall 56 establish minimum specifications for breaching tools and 57 ballistic shields. 58 (c)âEach private school may use existing grants from the 59 School Hardening Grant Program as funded by the Legislature or 60 may use other available state or private funds to meet the 61 requirements of this subsection. 62 (d)âEach private school shall ensure that at least one 63 school employee or the schoolâs safe-school officer receives 64 annual training on the deployment and safe use of the equipment 65 required under this subsection. The training must be conducted 66 in coordination with the sheriffâs office or a local law 67 enforcement agency having jurisdiction. 68 (e)âEach private school shall annually report to the Office 69 of Safe Schools, in a format prescribed by the office, that the 70 equipment required under this section is present on each campus, 71 functional, and accessible. The office may conduct random audits 72 to verify compliance with this subsection. 73 Section 3.âParagraph (i) is added to subsection (6) of 74 section 1006.07, Florida Statutes, to read: 75 1006.07âDistrict school board duties relating to student 76 discipline and school safety.âThe district school board shall 77 provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the 78 attendance and control of students at school, and for proper 79 attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the 80 welfare of students, including: 81 (6)âSAFETY AND SECURITY BEST PRACTICES.âEach district 82 school superintendent shall establish policies and procedures 83 for the prevention of violence on school grounds, including the 84 assessment of and intervention with individuals whose behavior 85 poses a threat to the safety of the school community. 86 (i)âSchool safety equipment requirements.â 87 1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 88 a.ââBallistic shieldâ means a mobile protective device 89 meeting the National Institute of Justiceâs Level IIIA ballistic 90 resistance standards or higher. 91 b.ââBreaching toolâ means a device designed to provide 92 rapid access to locked or barricaded doors in an emergency, 93 including, but not limited to, a Halligan bar, sledgehammer, or 94 hydraulic breaching tool approved by a local law enforcement 95 agency. 96 c.ââCampusâ means the grounds and facilities of a public 97 school, including charter schools. 98 2.âEach public school, including charter schools, shall 99 have at least one breaching tool and one ballistic shield on 100 each campus of the school for use in the event of an active 101 assailant or other life-threatening incident. The Department of 102 Education, in consultation with the Department of Law 103 Enforcement, shall establish minimum specifications for 104 breaching tools and ballistic shields. 105 3.âEach school may use existing grants from the School 106 Hardening Grant Program as funded by the Legislature or may use 107 other state or private funds to meet the requirements of this 108 paragraph. 109 4.âEach school shall ensure that at least one school 110 employee or the schoolâs safe-school officer receives annual 111 training on the deployment and safe use of the equipment 112 required under this paragraph. The training must be conducted in 113 coordination with the sheriffâs office or a local law 114 enforcement agency having jurisdiction. 115 5.âEach school shall annually report to the Office of Safe 116 Schools, in a format prescribed by the office, that the 117 equipment required under this section is present on each campus, 118 functional, and accessible. The office may conduct random audits 119 to verify compliance with this paragraph. 120 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.